Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-3413
Nebraska Poultry and Egg Development, Utilization, and Marketing Fund; created; administration; department; accept funds.

(1) The State Treasurer is hereby directed to establish in the treasury of the State of Nebraska a fund to be known as the Nebraska Poultry and Egg Development, Utilization, and Marketing Fund, to which shall be credited all fees collected by the department pursuant to the Nebraska Poultry and Egg Resources Act. After appropriation, the Director of Administrative Services shall, upon receipt of proper vouchers approved by the director, issue warrants on such fund including refund payments authorized by section 2-3409 and the State Treasurer shall pay the warrants out of the money credited to such fund. Any money in the fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.

(2) The department may accept grants, contributions, or other funds from any private or federal, state, or other public source to be used to administer the Nebraska Poultry and Egg Resources Act and to conduct programs under such act.

Laws 1976, LB 514, § 13;

Laws 1984, LB 991, § 3;

Laws 1995, LB 7, § 17.
December 31, 2027
Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.